Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.220

Fees.

Corporations are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2102; 2002 c 297 s 3; 1993 c 269 s 2; 1992 c 107 s 7; 1991 c 72 s 26; 1990 c 178 s 1; 1989 c 165 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Effective dates—1992 c 107: See note following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1990 c 178: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1990." [ 1990 c 178 s 13.]